Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1803.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1123456789101112131415161718 PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Advisory Council on PANDAS and PANS Act.CHAPTER 2ADVISORY COUNCIL ON PANDAS AND PANSSection 201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advisory council." The Advisory Council on PANDAS and PANS."PANDAS." Pediatric Autoimmune Neuropsychiatric Disorders Associated with Streptococcal Infections."PANS." Pediatric Acute-onset Neuropsychiatric Syndrome."Secretary." The Secretary of Health of the Commonwealth.Section 202. Establishment of advisory council.(a) Establishment.--The secretary shall establish the Advisory Council on PANDAS and PANS for the purpose of advising the secretary on PANDAS and PANS, including on matters relating to the research, diagnosis, treatment and education of PANDAS and PANS.(b) Appointed members.--The secretary shall appoint the following members to the advisory council:(1) A licensed immunologist who practices in this Commonwealth and has experience treating individuals with PANDAS and PANS and the use of intravenous immunoglobulin.(2) A licensed health care practitioner who practices in this Commonwealth and has expertise in treating individuals with PANDAS, PANS, autism spectrum disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder and other neurological disorders.20250HB1803PN2217 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A representative of a Statewide advocacy organization for individuals with PANDAS and PANS from within this Commonwealth.(4) A licensed osteopathic physician who practices in this Commonwealth and who has experience treating individuals with PANDAS and PANS.(5) A medical researcher with experience conducting research concerning PANDAS, PANS, autism spectrum disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder and other neurological disorders.(6) A certified dietitian or nutritionist who practices in this Commonwealth and provides services to children with PANDAS, PANS, autism spectrum disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder and other neurological disorders.(7) A representative of a professional organization in this Commonwealth for school psychologists who is a school psychologist.(8) A child psychiatrist who has experience treating individuals with PANDAS, PANS, autism spectrum disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder and other neurological disorders.(9) A representative of a professional organization in this Commonwealth for school nurses who is a school nurse.(10) A pediatrician who has experience treating individuals with PANDAS, PANS, autism spectrum disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder and other neurological disorders.(11) A representative of an organization focused on autism.(12) A parent with a child who has been diagnosed with 20250HB1803PN2217 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PANDAS or PANS.(13) A licensed social worker whose practice focuses on children in this Commonwealth.(c) Additional members.--The following shall be members of the advisory committee:(1) A representative of the Bureau of Special Education of the Department of Education.(2) The chair and minority chair of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate or their designees.(3) The chair and minority chair of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives or their designees.(4) The secretary or the secretary's designee, who shall be a nonvoting member.(d) General Assembly.--A member of the advisory committee under subsection (b)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12) or (13) may be a member of the General Assembly.(e) Doctors.--The physician members of the council shall include at least one medical doctor and at least one osteopathic doctor.(f) Deadline.--All appointments to the advisory council shall be made no later than 30 days after the effective date of this section.Section 203. Compensation of advisory council members.A member of the advisory council shall receive no compensation except for reimbursement for necessary expenses incurred in performing the member's duties.Section 204. Meetings.The secretary shall call the first meeting of the advisory council no later than 60 days after the effective date of this 20250HB1803PN2217 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section. The advisory council shall meet upon the call of the chair or upon the request of a majority of the advisory council members.Section 205. Quorum.A majority of the advisory council members shall constitute a quorum. A majority vote of a quorum shall be required for any official action of the advisory council.Section 206. Duties of advisory council.The advisory council shall have the following duties:(1) The advisory council shall elect the chair of the advisory council.(2) No later than January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the advisory council shall submit a report to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the Health Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include, but not be limited to, recommendations on the following matters:(i) Practice guidelines for the diagnosis and treatment of PANDAS and PANS.(ii) Mechanisms to increase clinical awareness and education of PANDAS and PANS among health care practitioners, including pediatricians, school-based health centers and providers of mental health services.(iii) Outreach programs for educators and parents to increase awareness of PANDAS and PANS.(iv) The development of a network of volunteer experts on the diagnosis and treatment of PANDAS and PANS to assist in education and outreach.CHAPTER 20MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS20250HB1803PN2217 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2001. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1803PN2217 - 6 - 12